California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) The local protection program, any component thereof, or any amendment, shall not take effect until it has been formally adopted by the responsible local government or district, or the Solano County Local Agency Formation Commission if responsible, and certified by the commission.

(b) Any amendment, or portion of any amendment, to the local protection program that would affect any area outside the marsh shall not be effective until the governing body of the local government or district has (1) held a public hearing on the proposed amendment, of which at least 30 days’ notice has been given; (2) notified the commission and the county in writing of the nature and text of the proposed amendment at least 30 days prior to adoption, which notification shall be accompanied by a resolution adopted by the governing body stating that the amendment is consistent with this division and the policies of the protection plan; and (3) submitted the amendment as adopted to the commission and the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29420.

(a) Upon request to the commission, the commission shall grant to the county an extension of the time limit provided in Section 29412 for submission to the commission of the local protection program, or of the time limit provided in Section 29411 for submission to the county of any local protection program component; provided, however, that no extension hereunder may authorize submission of the local protection program, or any component thereof, after January 1, 1980.

(b) The commission may extend, for a period not to exceed one year, any other time limitation established by this chapter for good cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29421.

If on or before January 1, 1981, the local protection program is not certified, or if the local protection program as certified lacks a component from one or more local governments, the commission may take any of the following actions if it finds that, in the absence of the certified local protection program or component, (1) any new development in the marsh or in any area for which there is no local protection program component would be inconsistent with this division and the protection plan and (2) the development controls contained in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 29500) are inadequate to ensure consistency with this division and the protection plan:

(a) Prohibit or otherwise restrict, by regulation, the affected local government from issuing any permit or any type of entitlement for use for any development within the marsh, or any portion thereof, within the jurisdiction of such local government.

(b) By regulation, extend the permit requirements of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 29500) by requiring a permit from the commission for any development within any area of the marsh under the jurisdiction of the affected local government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29422.

(a) The commission shall, by no later than July 1, 2025, and at least once every five years thereafter, review the certified local protection program, and each component of the program, to determine whether
 the program is being effectively implemented in conformity with the policies of this division. If the commission determines that the certified local protection program, or any component of the program, is not being carried out in conformity with this division or the protection plan, it shall submit to the affected local government or district, or the Solano County Local Agency Formation Commission if affected, recommendations of corrective actions that should be taken. The recommendations may include recommended
 amendments to the local protection program or any component of the program.

(b) Recommendations submitted pursuant to this section shall be reviewed by the affected local government or district, or the Solano County Local Agency Formation Commission if affected, and, if the recommended action is not taken, the local government, district, or the Solano County Local Agency Formation Commission shall, within one year of the submission, forward to the commission a report setting forth its
 reasons for not taking the recommended action. The commission shall review the report and, where appropriate, report to the Legislature and recommend legislative action necessary to assure effective implementation of the relevant policy of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 220, Sec. 2.   (AB 2809)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

29423.

If the application of the certified local protection program, or any component or part thereof, is prohibited or enjoined by any court, any development that would otherwise be subject to such program, or any component or part thereof, shall by operation of law be subject to the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 29500) relating to control of development prior to certification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29424.

Nothing in this chapter shall permit the commission to certify a local protection program, or any component thereof, which provides for a lesser degree of environmental protection than that provided by the plans and policies of any state regulatory agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Agricultural Lands [29427. - 29427.]

29427.

(a) Prior to certification of the county’s component of the local protection program, the county shall designate the area of the county adjacent to the marsh that should be retained in agricultural use, or in uses that are compatible with agricultural use, in order to ensure the long-term agricultural use and productivity of agricultural lands within the marsh.

(b) Within such area the county shall do all of the following prior to certification of the county’s component: (1) determine the minimum size parcels necessary for long-term agricultural use and productivity, (2) establish enforceable standards limiting or prohibiting land divisions or other types of development that are inconsistent with protection of the marsh and continued agricultural use, (3) establish enforceable standards precluding agricultural uses by type and intensity that are inconsistent with the long-term preservation of the marsh, and (4) limit special assessments against agricultural lands for the provision of public services, the demand for which is not generated by agricultural uses on such lands.

(c) No change by the county of any designation, standard, or limitation established pursuant to this section shall become effective until 30 days after it has notified the commission of the proposed change and unless it makes a specific finding that the change will not adversely affect, directly or indirectly, the long-term agricultural use and productivity of agricultural lands within the marsh.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Preferential Assessment [29430. - 29433.]

29430.

(a) Any person who owns land within the marsh that is being used for the purpose of agriculture or wildlife habitat on January 1, 1978, or that is used for such a purpose at any time after that date, may petition the local government having jurisdiction over the land to enter into a contract pursuant to the California Land Conservation Act of 1965 (Williamson Act) (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 51200) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code) or a wildlife habitat contract, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 421 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) Upon receipt of a petition pursuant to subdivision (a), such local government is authorized to, and shall, enter into such contract with the petitioning landowner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29431.

Neither the acreage limitations contained in Section 51230 of the Government Code and subdivision (f) of Section 421 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, nor the requirements of Section 51242 of the Government Code, shall apply to any contract entered into pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29432.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 51243 of the Government Code, upon the annexation by a city of any land within the marsh that is under contract with the county, the city shall succeed to all rights, duties, and powers of the county under such contract and the contract shall remain effective for all purposes even if (1) the land being annexed was within one mile of such city at the time that the contract was entered into; (2) the city had filed, and the local agency formation commission had approved, a protest to the contract pursuant to Section 51234.5 of the Government Code; and (3) the city had stated its intent not to succeed in its resolution of intention to annex.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29433.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 51282, 51283, 51283.3, and 51285 of the Government Code, no contract with any person concerning land within the marsh and entered into by any local government pursuant to the California Land Conservation Act of 1965 (Williamson Act) (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 51200) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code) or pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 421 of the Revenue and Taxation Code may be canceled, nor shall a notice of nonrenewal of any such contract by any local government be effective, without the consent of the commission, if such contract was in effect on or after September 27, 1974.

(b) The commission may not consent to the cancellation or notice of nonrenewal of any such contract unless the commission finds that such cancellation or nonrenewal is consistent with the provisions of this division and the protection plan.

(c) Other than as expressly provided herein, this section does not affect the right of any person or local government relating to the renewal or nonrenewal of any such contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Development Controls [29500. - 29524.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [29500. - 29510.]

29500.

In addition to obtaining any other permit required by law from any local government or from a state, regional, or local agency, on and after January 1, 1978, any person wishing to perform or undertake any development in the marsh shall obtain a marsh development permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29501.

(a) Within the primary management area, a marsh development permit required under Section 29500 shall be obtained from the commission and shall be in lieu of any other permit that may be required by law from the commission.

(b) The commission shall issue a marsh development permit under this section if it finds that the proposed development is consistent with either the provisions of this division and the policies of the protection plan or the certified local protection program, if any.

(c) Subsequent to certification of the local protection program, the commission may define and delegate by regulation to the local government having jurisdiction the commission’s permit authority under this section over development that does not have significant impact on the marsh. Any local government to which the commission has delegated any part of its permit authority under this section shall issue a marsh development permit under this section if it finds the proposed development is consistent with the local protection program.

(d) Any action by a local government on an application for a marsh development permit under this section may be appealed to the commission pursuant to Section 29522. The commission, on appeal, shall issue the permit if it finds the proposed development that is the subject of the appeal is consistent with the local protection program.

(e) Any delegation by the commission of its permit authority under this section may be revoked at any time for good cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29501.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 29500, within the primary management area no marsh development permit shall be required for any development specified in the component of the local protection program prepared by the Suisun Resource Conservation District and certified by the commission pursuant to Section 29415.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29502.

(a) Except as provided in Section 29505, within the secondary management area, a marsh development permit required under Section 29500 shall be obtained from the local government having jurisdiction over the land in which the proposed development is to occur.

(b) The local government may incorporate the procedures for issuing marsh development permits into its procedures relating to the issuance of any other land use or development permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29503.

(a) Prior to certification of the local protection program, a local government may issue a marsh development permit pursuant to Section 29502 only if it finds that the proposed development (1) is in conformity with this division and the policies of the protection plan and (2) will not prejudice the preparation of the local protection program.

(b) Subsequent to certification, a local government may issue a marsh development permit pursuant to Section 29502 only if it finds that the proposed development is consistent with the certified local protection program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29504.

(a) Any action taken by a local government on an application for a marsh development permit pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 29503, except an action denying such an application, may be appealed to the commission.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (e) of this section, any action taken by a local government on an application for a marsh development permit pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 29503 may be appealed to the commission.

(c) Prior to certification of the local protection program, the commission, on appeal, shall issue the marsh development permit only if it finds that the proposed development that is the subject of the appeal (1) is in conformity with this division and the policies of the protection plan and (2) will not prejudice the preparation of the local protection program.

(d) Subsequent to certification of the local protection program, the commission, on appeal, shall issue the marsh development permit only if it finds the proposed development that is the subject of the appeal is in conformity with the local protection program. However, this subdivision does not authorize the commission, on appeal, to consider any action by local government on a marsh development permit which is not appealable to the commission by virtue of the provisions of subdivision (e) of this section.

(e) The following actions of a local government on an application for a marsh development permit are not appealable to the commission under this section:

(1) Any action denying an application for a marsh development permit.

(2) Any action that consists of a finding that a development is a principal permitted use under a zoning ordinance or zoning district map that has been certified by the commission as part of the local protection program and any action that authorizes such development to the extent, but only to the extent, such action is based on such finding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29505.

No person shall be required to obtain a marsh development permit from local government for any development on tidelands, submerged lands, or other public trust lands, whether filled or unfilled, or for any development by a public agency for which a local government permit is not otherwise required, but in such a case, a marsh development permit shall be obtained from the commission. The commission shall issue a marsh development permit pursuant to this section if the commission finds that the proposed development is consistent with either this division and the policies of the protection plan or the certified local protection program, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29506.

Any permit that is issued or any development or action that is approved on appeal pursuant to this division shall be subject to such reasonable terms and conditions as the commission determines will ensure that such development or action will be in accordance with the provisions of this division and the protection plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29507.

(a) No person who has obtained a vested right in a development prior to January 1, 1978, or who has obtained a valid permit for development from the commission pursuant to Title 7.2 (commencing with Section 66600) of the Government Code or from the commission or any local government pursuant to former Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1850) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code shall be required to secure a permit for the development pursuant to this division. However, no substantial change may be made in any such development or with respect to the activity authorized by such a permit without prior approval having been obtained under this division.

(b) Any person who claims a vested right in a development and thereby an exemption from the requirements of this division shall, on or before January 1, 1979, notify the commission in writing by filing a claim of exemption with the commission. If any person does not file a claim of exemption on or before that date the development of such person shall be subject to the approval requirements of this division.

(c) The commission shall establish, by regulation, procedures, including public hearings, for determining claims of exemption and may require documentation or other competent evidence, including declarations under penalty of perjury or affidavits, to support any such claim.

(d) The commission shall take reasonable steps to notify persons of the provisions of this section, but the fact that any person did not receive such notice shall not extend the period within which a claim of exemption must be filed under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29508.

Notwithstanding any provision of this division to the contrary, no marsh development permit shall be required pursuant to this chapter for the following types of development and in the following areas:

(a) Improvement to existing single-family residences.

(b) Repair, replacement, reconstruction, or maintenance that does not result in an addition to, or enlargement or expansion of, the object of such repair, replacement, reconstruction, or maintenance. However, if the commission determines that certain types of repair, replacement, reconstruction, or maintenance activities involve a risk of substantial adverse environmental impact, it shall require, by regulation, that a permit be obtained under this chapter.

(c) The installation, testing, and placement in service or the replacement of any necessary utility connection between an existing service facility and any other development for which a marsh development permit is required and has been issued pursuant to this division. However, the commission may, whenever it deems necessary, require, as a condition to the issuance of such a permit, reasonable measures for the mitigation of any adverse impacts on marsh resources, including scenic resources.

(d) Any category of development, or any category of development within a specifically defined geographic area, that the commission, by regulation, after public hearings, and by a two-thirds vote of its members, has described or identified and with respect to which the commission has found that there is no potential for any significant adverse effect, either individually or cumulatively, on the resources of the marsh and that such exclusion will not impair the ability of any local government or district or the Solano County Local Agency Formation Commission to prepare its component of the local protection program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29509.

(a) When immediate action by a person performing a public service is required to protect life and public property from imminent danger, or to restore, repair, or maintain public works, levees, dikes, utilities, or services destroyed, damaged, or interrupted by natural disaster, serious accident, or in other cases of emergency, no permit from the commission shall be required prior to commencing such action if within three days of the disaster or the discovery of the danger, whichever occurs first, the person performing such action notifies the executive director of the commission of the type and location of the work undertaken pursuant to such action. Upon such notification, the executive director of the commission may waive the requirements for a permit or other authorization for such work. However, this section does not authorize the permanent erection of structures valued at more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(b) The commission shall provide, by regulation, for the issuance of marsh development permits by the executive director of the commission, without compliance with the procedures specified in this chapter, in cases of emergency, other than an emergency as provided in subdivision (a) of this section, or for minor repairs or improvements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29510.

Not later than two years following certification of the local protection program, the commission shall report to the Legislature regarding the operation of the appellate procedure in the secondary management area, as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 29504. Not less than 60 days prior to the date on which the report is required to be submitted to the Legislature, the report shall be made available, for review and comment, to each local government having jurisdiction within the marsh. Not later than 30 days prior to the date on which the report is required to be submitted to the Legislature, any comments by a local government shall be submitted to the commission. Each such comment shall be included in the commission’s report, together with the commission’s response thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Development Control Procedures [29520. - 29524.]

29520.

(a) Except as expressly provided in this division, the commission shall use the procedures set forth in Title 7.2 (commencing with Section 66600) of the Government Code for the submission, review, and issuance by the commission of marsh development permits and claims of exemption.

(b) The commission or any local government may require a reasonable filing fee and the reimbursement of expenses for the processing by the commission or the local government of any application by any person for a marsh development permit under this division. The funds received under this subdivision shall be deposited in the General Fund and shall be available for expenditure by the commission only when appropriated by the Legislature therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29521.

Not later than March 1, 1978, the commission shall adopt procedures for the submission, review, and appeal of applications for marsh development permits to be issued by local government. Such procedures shall include reasonable provisions for notification to the commission and other interested persons of any action by a local government pursuant to this division in sufficient detail to assure that a preliminary review of such action for conformity with the provisions of this division can be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29522.

(a) Any appealable action on a marsh development permit for any development by a local government may be appealed to the commission by any aggrieved person or by any two members of the commission. Such action shall become final after the 20th working day after receipt of the notice required by Section 29521, unless an appeal is filed within that time.

(b) If an appeal of any action on a development by any local government is filed with the commission, the operation and effect of such action shall be stayed pending the commission’s decision on the appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29523.

The commission shall hear an appeal unless it determines that the appeal raises no substantial issue as to the conformity of the proposed development with the provisions of this division, the local protection program, if in existence, and the policies of the protection plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29524.

(a) The commission shall provide for a public hearing de novo on any appeal brought pursuant to this division and shall give to any affected person a written public notice of the nature of the proceeding and of the time and place of the public hearing. Notice shall also be given to any person who requests, in writing, such notice. A hearing on any appeal shall be set not earlier than 21 days nor later than 42 days after the date on which the appeal is filed with the commission.

(b) The commission shall act upon an appeal within 21 days after the conclusion of the hearing pursuant to subdivision (a) and may approve, modify, or deny the application for the proposed development; and if no action is taken within the time limits specified in this subdivision and subdivision (a), the decision of the local government shall become final.

(c) Thirteen affirmative votes of members of the commission, or of the commission hearing an appeal, are required to grant a permit. Neither of the federal representatives who are members of the commission may vote on whether or not a permit shall be granted.

(d) The applicant for a marsh development permit may waive any time limits prescribed in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Judicial Review, Enforcement, and Penalties [29600. - 29612.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [29600. - 29606.]

29600.

The provisions of this chapter shall be in addition to any other remedies available pursuant to law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29601.

The provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 66630) of Title 7. 2 of the Government Code relating to cease and desist orders and penalties for violations thereof shall apply to all development for which a marsh development permit from the commission, or the commission hearing an appeal, may be required under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29602.

Any aggrieved person may seek judicial review of any decision or action of the commission by filing a petition for a writ of mandate in accordance with the provisions of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure within 60 days after such decision or action has become final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29603.

Any aggrieved person, including an applicant for a marsh development permit, or the commission, may seek judicial review of any decision made or any action taken pursuant to this division by a local government that is implementing the certified local protection program, or any component thereof, whether or not such decision or action has been appealed to the commission, by filing a petition for writ of mandate in accordance with the provisions of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure within 60 days after the decision or action has become final. The commission may intervene in any such proceeding upon a showing that the matter involves a question of the conformity of a proposed development with the certified local protection program, or any component thereof, or the validity of any action taken by a local government to implement or amend the local protection program, or any component thereof. Any local government may request that the commission intervene. Notice of any such action against a local government shall be filed with the commission within five working days of the filing of such action. When an action is brought challenging the validity of the local protection program, or any component thereof or any amendment thereto, a preliminary showing shall be made prior to proceeding on the merits as to why such action should not have been brought pursuant to the provisions of Section 29602.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29604.

Any person may maintain an action to enforce the duties specifically imposed upon the commission, any governmental agency, any district, or any local government by this division. No bond shall be required for an action under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29605.

Any person may maintain an action for the recovery of civil penalties provided in Section 29610 or 29611. Any penalties so recovered shall inure to the state and shall be deposited in the Bay Fill Clean-up and Abatement Fund established pursuant to Section 66647 of the Government Code. However, the person recovering such penalties shall be entitled to reimbursement for reasonable attorney’s fees out of the penalties so recovered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 413, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

29606.

Any civil action under this division by or against a city or county, the commission, a district, or any other public agency shall, upon motion of either party, be transferred to a county or city and county not a party to the action or to a county or city and county other than that in which the city, district, or other public agency which is a party to the action is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Penalties [29610. - 29612.]

29610.

(a) Any person who intentionally or negligently violates any provision of this division shall be subject to a civil fine of not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(b) In addition to any other penalties, any person who intentionally and knowingly commences any development in violation of this division shall be subject to a civil fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) and no more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day for each day in which such violation occurs.

(c) If any person negligently or intentionally violates a cease and desist order issued pursuant to Section 29601, then the penalties provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply and the penalties provided in Section 66641 of the Government Code shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29611.

Except as provided in Section 818 of the Government Code, whenever a person has intentionally and knowingly violated any provision of this division, the commission may maintain an action, in addition to an action under Section 29610, for the recovery of exemplary damages. In determining the amount to be awarded, the court shall consider the amount of such damages necessary to deter further violations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29612.

Any moneys recovered by the commission under this article shall be deposited in the Bay Fill Clean-up and Abatement Fund established pursuant to Section 66647 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 413, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 19.5. DELTA PROTECTION ACT OF 1992 [29700. - 29780.]



CHAPTER 1. Findings and Declarations [29700. - 29716.]

29700.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the Johnston-Baker-Andal-Boatwright Delta Protection Act of 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29701.

The Legislature finds and declares that the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta is a natural resource of statewide, national, and international significance, containing irreplaceable resources, and it is the policy of the state to recognize, preserve, and protect those resources of the delta for the use and enjoyment of current and future generations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29702.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the basic goals of the state for the Delta are the following:

(a) Achieve the two coequal goals of providing a more reliable water supply for California and protecting, restoring, and enhancing the Delta ecosystem. The coequal goals shall be achieved in a manner that protects and enhances the unique cultural, recreational, natural resource, and agricultural values of the Delta as an evolving place.

(b) Protect, maintain, and, where possible, enhance and restore the overall quality of the Delta environment, including, but not limited to, agriculture, wildlife habitat, and recreational
 activities.

(c) Ensure orderly, balanced conservation and development of Delta land resources.

(d) Improve flood protection by structural and nonstructural means to ensure an increased level of public health and safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29703.

The Legislature further finds and declares as follows:

(a) The delta is an agricultural region of great value to the state and nation and the retention and continued cultivation and production of fertile peatlands and prime soils are of significant value.

(b) The agricultural land of the delta, while adding greatly to the economy of the state, also provides a significant value as open space and habitat for water fowl using the Pacific Flyway, as well as other wildlife, and the continued dedication and retention of that delta land in agricultural production contributes to the preservation and enhancement of open space and habitat values.

(c) Agricultural lands located within the primary zone should be protected from the intrusion of nonagricultural uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29703.5.

The Legislature further finds and declares both of the following:

(a) The Delta Protection Commission created pursuant to Section 29735 provides an existing forum for Delta residents to engage in decisions regarding actions to recognize and enhance the unique cultural, recreational, and agricultural resources of the Delta. As such, the commission is the appropriate agency to identify and provide recommendations to the Delta Stewardship Council on methods of preserving the Delta as an evolving place as the Delta Stewardship Council develops and implements the Delta Plan.

(b) There is a need for the five Delta counties to establish and implement a resources
 management plan for the Delta and for the Delta Stewardship Council to consider that plan and recommendations of the commission in the adoption of the Delta Plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 2.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29704.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the leveed islands and tracts of the delta and portions of its uplands are floodprone areas of critical statewide significance due to the public safety risks and the costs of public emergency responses to floods, and that improvement and ongoing maintenance of the levee system is a matter of continuing urgency to protect farmlands, population centers, the state’s water quality, and significant natural resource and habitat areas of the delta. The Legislature further finds that improvements and continuing maintenance of the levee system will not resolve all flood risks and that the delta is inherently a floodprone area wherein the most appropriate land uses are agriculture, wildlife habitat, and, where specifically provided, recreational activities, and that most of the existing levee systems are degraded and in need of restoration, improvement, and continuing management.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29705.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the delta’s wildlife and wildlife habitats, including waterways, vegetated unleveed channel islands, wetlands, and riparian forests and vegetation corridors, are highly valuable, providing critical wintering habitat for waterfowl and other migratory birds using the Pacific Flyway, as well as certain plant species, various rare and endangered wildlife species of birds, mammals, and fish, and numerous amphibians, reptiles, and invertebrates, that these wildlife species and their habitat are valuable, unique, and irreplaceable resources of critical statewide significance, and that it is the policy of the state to preserve and protect these resources and their diversity for the enjoyment of current and future generations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29706.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the resource values of the delta have deteriorated, and that further deterioration threatens the maintenance and sustainability of the delta’s ecology, fish and wildlife populations, recreational opportunities, and economic productivity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29707.

The Legislature further finds and declares that there is no process by which state and national interests and values can be protected and enhanced for the delta, and that, to protect the regional, state, and national interests for the long-term agricultural productivity, economic vitality, and ecological health of the delta resources, it is necessary to provide and implement delta land use planning and management by local governments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29708.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the cities, towns, and settlements within the delta are of significant historical, cultural, and economic value and that their continued protection is important to the economic and cultural vitality of the region.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

29709.

The Legislature further finds and declares as follows:
